Connecticut, session 2026, HB05209.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 36a-498i of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section and section 2 of this act, "mortgage lender"
and "shared appreciation agreement" have the same meanings as
provided in section 36a-485.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) (1) The interest charged
pursuant to a shared appreciation agreement shall be (A) simple
interest, and (B) calculated on the basis of the lump sum payment paid
by the borrower to the lender at the time when the loan matures.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 37-9 of the general
statutes, each shared appreciation agreement shall be subject to the
provisions of sections 37-1 and 37-4 of the general statutes.
LCO No. 1577 1 of 6

Raised Bill No. 5209
(b) A shared appreciation agreement shall not:
(1) Contain any provision that requires the borrower to occupy the
property that is the subject of the shared appreciation agreement or
otherwise prevents the borrower from using such property as the
borrower chooses;
(2) Contain any provision that prevents the borrower from
refinancing a mortgage or lien or obtaining a subordinate mortgage or
lien against the property that is the subject of the shared appreciation
agreement;
(3) Require the borrower to pay more than half of any cost actually
paid to any third party associated with the origination, servicing or
satisfaction of the shared appreciation agreement;
(4) Require the borrower to pay any fee or cost to any mortgage
servicer or the lender after origination, except for any bona fide charge
paid to a third party;
(5) Include a prepayment penalty or otherwise require payment of
any additional sum to satisfy or otherwise terminate the shared
appreciation agreement at any point before its scheduled maturity date
or termination date;
(6) Contain any provision restricting or waiving the substantive or
procedural rights or remedies available to the borrower at law or in
equity;
(7) Charge the borrower for any attorney's fees or legal costs incurred
by the lender arising from any dispute, claim or legal proceeding related
to the loan, regardless of the outcome of such dispute, claim or
proceeding;
(8) Include a confidentiality provision regarding the terms of the
shared appreciation agreement or any dispute related to the shared
appreciation agreement; or
LCO No. 1577 2 of 6

Raised Bill No. 5209
(9) Contain a provision allowing the lender to alter any term of the
shared appreciation agreement without the express written consent of
the borrower.
(c) The terms of a shared appreciation agreement shall contain:
(1) A provision requiring the lender to provide to the borrower at
least ninety days' advance written advance notice of any action required
of the borrower under the terms of the shared appreciation agreement,
which, if not timely taken by the borrower, will affect the rights or
interests of the borrower under such agreement;
(2) A provision requiring the lender to provide to the borrower, not
later than three business days after the lender receives a request from
the borrower for the same and at no cost to the borrower, a payoff quote
that itemizes everything for which the borrower is liable to pay to the
lender;
(3) A provision requiring the lender to provide to the borrower, not
later than three business days after the lender receives a request from
the borrower for the same, a written description of the process for
terminating the shared appreciation agreement;
(4) A provision specifying that the borrower shall receive credit for
all improvements made to the property that is the subject of the shared
appreciation agreement in an amount equal to the total amount paid for
all such improvements or any increase in the appraised value of such
property resulting from such improvements, whichever is greater;
(5) A provision stating that the value of any adjustments for lack of
maintenance or for improvements shall be determined by a property
appraisal conducted by a certified or licensed appraiser in accordance
with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice issued
by the Appraisal Standards Board of the Appraisal Foundation
pursuant to Title XI of FIRREA, as amended from time to time;
LCO No. 1577 3 of 6

Raised Bill No. 5209
(6) A provision stating that any property valuation required by the
shared appreciation agreement, including, but not limited to, any such
valuation performed at or before origination or at the conclusion of such
agreement, shall be performed by a licensed or certified appraiser in
accordance with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal
Practice issued by the Appraisal Standards Board of the Appraisal
Foundation pursuant to Title XI of FIRREA, as amended from time to
time. The appraiser shall not be affiliated with the lender. The valuation
may not be discounted or otherwise adjusted from the actual appraised
value;
(7) A right to cancel the shared appreciation agreement for three
business days after consummation or the delivery of all disclosures
required pursuant to section 36a-498i of the general statutes, as
amended by this act, whichever is later;
(8) A provision specifying that:
(A) If the borrower is unable to repay the loan in full at maturity
without selling the property that is the subject of the shared appreciation
agreement, the lender agrees to refinance the remaining balance due
with a fully amortizing, thirty-year, closed-end mortgage with a fixed
interest rate at the current market interest rate, using the current version
of the Fannie Mae-Freddie Mac uniform instruments; and
(B) If such refinancing is not completed by the maturity date through
no fault of the borrower, the lender agrees not to pursue foreclosure or
require sale of such property until the refinancing transaction is
completed, and only thereafter upon default on the refinanced loan; and
(9) A provision requiring that, if the borrower is successful in an
action disputing a provision of the shared appreciation agreement, the
lender shall be responsible for any reasonable attorney's fees and legal
100 costs incurred by the borrower in connection with such action.
101 (d) A mortgage, deed of trust or equivalent consensual security
LCO No. 1577 4 of 6

Raised Bill No. 5209
102 interest in the borrower's principal dwelling that secures any obligation
103 under a shared appreciation agreement shall state the maximum
104 amount, in dollars, that the borrower may be required to pay pursuant
105 to the agreement.
106 (e) (1) A lender shall not consummate a shared appreciation
107 agreement unless the lender receives documentation disclosing that:
108 (A) The borrower has obtained homeownership counseling from (i) a
109 counseling organization or counselor certified or approved by the
110 United States Department of Housing and Urban Development to
111 provide reverse mortgage or home equity conversion mortgage
112 counseling, or (ii) any other person authorized by the Department of
113 Banking;
114 (B) The borrower has received counseling on the cost, affordability
115 and risks of the loan; and
116 (C) The counseling organization, counselor or authorized person had
117 received by the time of the counseling session:
118 (i) A copy of the shared appreciation agreement; and
119 (ii) A cost disclosure form comparable to the loan estimate or final
120 disclosure described by the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of
121 1974, 12 USC 2601 et seq., as amended from time to time, and the Truth-
122 in-Lending Act, 15 USC Section 1601 et seq., as amended from time to
123 time, and the regulations promulgated under said acts.
124 (2) The counseling organization, counselor or authorized person shall
125 not be liable for determining the accuracy or completeness of any
126 documents provided pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.
127 (f) At the time of consummation of a shared appreciation agreement,
128 the lender shall provide the borrower with contemporaneous access to
129 a representative of the lender who is able to answer any questions the
130 borrower may have about the transaction.
LCO No. 1577 5 of 6

Raised Bill No. 5209
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 36a-498i(a)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 New section